Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.140

Annual data reports.

Upon a nonhigh school district's request, a host high school district shall provide an annual data report to the nonhigh school district within sixty days of the request. The report must include attendance, grades, discipline, and state assessment data for all nonhigh secondary students sent to the high school district.

[ 2020 c 225 s 2.]